Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.367

Off-street facility.

"Off-street facility" means a location typically held open for use by the public for parking vehicles, ingress and egress, or used for commercial purposes. Use of such locations falls under chapter 283, Laws of 2023 when used for illegal racing when such use is without the express permission of the owner of the facility.

[ 2023 c 283 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 283: "This act takes effect January 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 283 s 9.]